Tennessee, session 114, HB0943.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-5-102(a), is amended by deleting
the following language:
I hereby direct that my name appear on the official ballot as follows:
PRINT NAME
and substituting instead:
I hereby direct that my name appear on the official ballot as follows:
PRINT NAME AS IT APPEARS ON VOTER REGISTRATION RECORD
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-5-102, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(c) The candidate's name that will be shown on the ballot must match the
candidate's name as it appears on the candidate's voter registration record. Nicknames,
abbreviations, and variations in spelling are not authorized. The coordinator of elections
shall provide guidelines and examples to potential candidates to aid in compliance with
this subsection (c).
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0943
001979
- 1 -